Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 2. Mobile Machinery

§ 31-18-203.
Definitions; registration required.

As used in W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

:

“Mobile machinery” means heavy equipment, except shop or hand tools or attachments, which is self-propelled, towed or hauled and used primarily in construction and maintenance of roads, bridges, ditches, buildings or land reclamation;

The definitions in W.S.

31-1-101

apply in this division;

“This division” means W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

.

Except as provided in W.S.

31-18-204

, no mobile machinery shall be operated in this state, whether or not upon the public highways of this state, unless registered under this division. Prior to using any mobile machinery on any construction project receiving state funds, the contractor shall provide certification to the public agency or engineer in charge of the project that the mobile machinery has been registered as required by this division.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, mobile machinery listed on a property tax assessment roll in this state is exempt from the registration requirement of this division. Each county treasurer shall issue stickers pursuant to this division to owners of mobile machinery listed on a property tax assessment roll in this state upon receipt of an application by the owner and payment of an administrative fee of six dollars ($6.00).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-601

; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1.

Railroad maintenance equipment not “mobile machinery.” —

Heavy equipment not used primarily in the construction and maintenance of roads, bridges, ditches, buildings or land reclamation but instead used for railroad maintenance is not “mobile machinery” within the meaning of this section and, therefore, is not subject to registration fees. State v. Union Pac. R.R., 823 P.2d 539,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-18-204.
Exemptions.

The provisions of W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

do not apply to mobile machinery:

Owned by the United States, the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof;

Which is an implement of husbandry;

Currently registered under W.S.

31-2-201

or

31-18-201

;

Being transported from a point outside this state through this state or for delivery or repair in this state;

Held for sale by a person engaged in the business of selling mobile machinery;

Used in the extraction or production of bentonite, coal, trona or uranium and owned by the producer;

Used exclusively for the drilling of wells;

Brought into the state for a period not to exceed seven (7) calendar days to demonstrate the operation of the mobile machinery to prospective buyers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-2-602; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 2001, ch. 44, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

State v. Union Pac. R.R., 823 P.2d 539,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-18-205.
Registration; application; fees; department responsibilities; transfer of ownership.

Owners or operators of mobile machinery required to be registered under W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

shall apply to a county treasurer in this state annually and pay a registration fee in lieu of property taxes as provided in subsection (e) of this section. For mobile machinery registered after February 1 in any year, the fee shall be computed by multiplying the fee under subsection (e) of this section times the number of full months remaining in the calendar year and dividing by twelve (12). County treasurers shall distribute fees collected under this subsection in the same manner and proportion as property taxes.

County treasurers shall issue stickers and certificates of registration to owners of mobile machinery registered under this section. The sticker shall be displayed on the mobile machinery for which it was issued so as to be visible by a person not operating the mobile machinery.

The department shall prescribe application forms and the form of stickers and certificates of registration issued under this section and provide them without charge to each county treasurer. The department shall furnish stickers and a “mobile machinery register” to each county treasurer in a similar manner as a vehicle register is provided under W.S.

31-2-213

. The department may promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.

The registration of mobile machinery expires ten (10) days after its transfer unless the original owner files an application for a transfer of ownership accompanied by the fees based on the amount which would be due on a new registration as of the date of transfer less any credit for the unused portion of the original registration fees for the original registration for the mobile machinery and an additional fee of six dollars ($6.00) with a county treasurer. Upon receipt of a completed application and the required fee, the county treasurer shall issue the new owner a new certificate of registration. The fee collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the county general fund.

The fee for mobile machinery shall be computed by multiplying the statewide average county, school district and state property tax mill levy for the preceding year as computed by the state board of equalization times the applicable assessment factor times the valuation of the mobile machinery. The department of revenue shall establish schedules for valuation of mobile machinery for use by county treasurers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-2-603; Laws 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence in subsection (c), see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

Quoted

in

State v. Union Pac. R.R., 823 P.2d 539,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-18-206.
Temporary registration.

In lieu of registration under W.S.

31-18-205

, a non-Wyoming based owner or operator of mobile machinery may apply for a temporary registration sticker valid for not more than eleven (11) months, providing the temporary registration sticker shall not extend in to the next calendar year, from either a county treasurer or the department. The owner or operator shall present sufficient documentation to allow the county treasurer or the department to establish the valuation of the mobile machinery. The fee for the authority to use and display the temporary sticker shall be computed by multiplying the fee under W.S.

31-18-205

(e) times the number of months requested in the calendar year and dividing by twelve (12), plus an administrative fee of ten dollars ($10.00) and six dollars ($6.00) for the sticker.

The fees for mobile machinery collected by the county treasurer under this section shall be distributed in the same manner and proportion as property taxes. The fees for mobile machinery collected by the department under this section shall be distributed in the same manner as fees for non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles under W.S. 31-3-103(a). Administrative fees collected by the county treasurer shall be deposited in the county general fund, and those collected by the department shall be deposited in the highway fund.

The sticker issued under this section shall be displayed on the mobile machinery in the same manner as stickers issued under W.S.

31-18-205

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-2-604; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; Laws 2001, ch. 44, § 1.

§ 31-18-207.
Rental or leased machinery.

In lieu of payment of the registration fee under W.S.

31-18-205

, the owner of any mobile machinery who is regularly engaged in the sale, rental or both sale and rental of mobile machinery and who rents or leases mobile machinery to another individual or corporation in which the owner has no interest for one (1) or more periods of at least sixty (60) days in any calendar year may elect to pay a registration fee under this section.

Authorization for payment of registration fees under this section shall be obtained from the county treasurer in the county in which the owner’s principal place of business is located. The owner shall also apply for an identifying decal for each item of mobile machinery to be rented or leased. The identifying decal shall be affixed to the item of mobile machinery at the time it is rented or leased. The owner shall keep records of each decal issued and a description of the item of mobile machinery to which it is affixed. The fee for each identifying decal is six dollars ($6.00), and payment shall be made at the time of application to the county treasurer. Decals expire at the end of each calendar year, and application for new decals shall be made for each calendar year or portion thereof. The owner shall remove any identifying decal upon the sale or change of ownership of mobile machinery. The fee collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the county general fund.

Upon receiving authorization under subsection (b) of this section, the owner shall collect from the user a registration fee in the amount equivalent to one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the amount of the rental or lease payment. No later than the twentieth day of the January following, the owner shall submit a calendar year report, using forms which shall be furnished by the department of revenue, to the county treasurer in which the mobile machinery is used, together with the remittance for all taxes collected for the preceding calendar year.

Reports shall be made even if no registration fees were collected by the owner in the previous calendar year. Failure to make reports for sixty (60) days is grounds for termination of the owner’s right to pay fees under this section. If the owner has failed to remit fees received from a renter or lessee during the sixty (60) day period, the county treasurer may proceed to collect these delinquent fees in the manner provided for collection of delinquent taxes under W.S. 39-13-108(e)(i)(A).

The department of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-2-605; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2001, ch. 90, § 1.

§ 31-18-208.
Prohibited act; penalties.

No person shall knowingly make any false statement in any application or other document required under W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both for each violation.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

31-18-203

through

31-18-208

shall, in addition to any fine imposed under subsection (b) of this section, pay the required fee plus a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the required fee.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 216, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-2-606; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.